Utah statutes.
59-2-1308.   Property assessed by commission -- Collection procedures --
Exceptions.
(1)  Property taxes assessed by the commission shall be collected, billed, and
paid in the manner provided for the collection, billing, and enforcement of
other general property taxes under this chapter, except:
(a)  the rolling stock of rail car companies; and
(b)  state-assessed commercial vehicles.
(2) (a) A county treasurer may require a taxpayer, other than a taxpayer
described in Subsection (1)(a) or (b), to pay an ad valorem tax liability
immediately if:
(i)  the taxpayer's property taxes are assessed by the commission under
Section 59-2-201; and
(ii)  the taxpayer gives any indication of:
(A)  departing from the state;
(B)  removing the taxpayer's property from the state; or
(C)  doing any other act which may prejudice or hinder the collection process
for any assessment period.
(b)  If a tax is not paid as provided in this chapter, the county treasurer
shall collect the tax:
(i)  for personal property and uniform fees, in the same manner as is provided
for the collection of delinquent taxes or uniform fees under Sections
59-2-1302 and 59-2-1303; or
(ii)  for all other property, including personal property and uniform fees
listed with real property under Section 59-2-1302, in the same manner as is
provided for the collection of delinquent taxes under Section 59-2-1331.
(c)  The provisions of Sections 59-2-1302 and 59-2-1303 apply to the
assessment by the commission or the county assessor of taxpayers other than a
taxpayer described in Subsection (1)(a) or (b).
